test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ciman_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - cîmân - ok : # -m inanimate noun, canoe
     cîmân+N+IN+Sg: cîmân
     cîmân+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nicîmân
     cîmân+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kicîmân
     cîmân+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nicîmâninân
     cîmân+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kicîmâninaw
     cîmân+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kicîmâniwâw
     cîmân+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: ocîmân
     cîmân+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: ocîmâniwâw
     cîmân+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: ocîmâniyiw

     cîmân+N+IN+Pl: cîmâna
     cîmân+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: nicîmâna
     cîmân+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kicîmâna
     cîmân+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: nicîmâninâna
     cîmân+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kicîmâninawa
     cîmân+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kicîmâniwâwa
     cîmân+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: ocîmâna
     cîmân+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: ocîmâniwâwa
     cîmân+N+IN+Pl+Px4Pl: ocîmâniyiwa

     cîmân+N+IN+Loc: cîmânihk
     cîmân+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: nicîmânihk
     cîmân+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kicîmânihk
     cîmân+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: nicîmâninâhk
     cîmân+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kicîmâninâhk
     cîmân+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kicîmâniwâhk
     cîmân+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: ocîmânihk
     cîmân+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: ocîmâniwâhk
     cîmân+N+IN+Px4Pl+Loc: ocîmâniyihk

     cîmân+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg: [cîmânis, cîmânisis]
     cîmân+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl: [cîmânisa, cîmânisisa]
     cîmân+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Loc: [cîmânisihk, cîmânisisihk]
     cîmân+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: [nicîmânis, nicîmânisis]
     cîmân+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: [nicîmânisihk, nicîmânisisihk]
